fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-miciw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mîciw - ok : # VTIw 

  
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg:    nimîcin # INDEPENDENT
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg:    kimîcin
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg:    mîciw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: mîciyiwa
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl:    nimîcinân
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+21Pl:   [kimîcinaw, kimîcinânaw]
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl:    kimîcinâwâw
     mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl:    mîciwak

     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-mîciyân # CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-mîciyan
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-mîcit
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-mîciyit
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-mîciyâhk
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-mîciyahk
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-mîciyêk
     PV/ê+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-mîcicik

     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg:    nikî-mîcin # PRT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg:    kikî-mîcin
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg:    kî-mîciw
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-mîciyiwa
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl:    nikî-mîcinân
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+21Pl:   [kikî-mîcinaw, kikî-mîcinânaw]
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl:    kikî-mîcinâwâw
     PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl:    kî-mîciwak

     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-kî-mîciyân # PRT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-kî-mîciyan
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-kî-mîcit
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-mîciyit
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-kî-mîciyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-kî-mîciyahk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-kî-mîciyêk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-kî-mîcicik


     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg:    niwî-mîcin # FUT+INT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg:    kiwî-mîcin
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg:    wî-mîciw
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-mîciyiwa
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl:    niwî-mîcinân
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+21Pl:   [kiwî-mîcinaw, kiwî-mîcinânaw]
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl:    kiwî-mîcinâwâw
     PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl:    wî-mîciwak

     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-wî-mîciyân # FUT+INT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-wî-mîciyan
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-wî-mîcit
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-mîciyit
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-wî-mîciyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-wî-mîciyahk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-wî-mîciyêk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîciw+V+TI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-wî-mîcicik

     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Sg:    nika-mîcin # FUT+DEF-INDEPENDENT
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Sg:    kika-mîcin
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Sg:    ka-mîciw
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-mîciyiwa
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+1Pl:    nika-mîcinân
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+21Pl:   [kika-mîcinaw, kika-mîcinânaw]
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+2Pl:    kika-mîcinâwâw
     PV/ka+mîciw+V+TI+Ind+3Pl:    ka-mîciwak
     
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+1Sg:    mîciyâni
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+2Sg:    mîciyani
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+3Sg:    mîcici
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîciyici
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+1Pl:    mîciyâhki
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+21Pl:   [mîciyahki, mîciyahko]
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+2Pl:    mîciyêko
     mîciw+V+TI+Cond+3Pl:    mîcitwâwi

     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Sg:  mîci
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: mîcitân
     mîciw+V+TI+Imp+Imm+2Pl:  mîcik


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmâw] # com SET I
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmânân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmânaw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmâwâw]
     
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmâwak] # com SET I-Pl
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmâwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmânânak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmânawak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmâwâwak]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmin] # com SET II
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîminân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîminâwâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîminân]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcîmêw] # com SET III
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcîmêwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcîmêyiwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcîmimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcîmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmimâwa] # com SET IV
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmimâwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcîmimânâna]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmimânawa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîciw+V+TI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcîmimâwâwa]
